Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1333
Cooperative farm land company; incorporation; purposes; general powers.

Any number of persons, not less than five, may form and organize a cooperative farm land company, with or without capital stock, for the purpose of facilitating the acquisition of agricultural and grazing lands by farmers and stock raisers, by the adoption of articles of incorporation in the same manner and with like powers and duties as other corporations, except as herein provided.

Laws 1941, c. 38, § 1, p. 153;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 24-2101;

R.S.1943, § 21-1333.